Utah statutes.
17B-1-1306.   Public hearing.
(1)  For each petition certified under Section 17B-1-1305 and each resolution
adopted under Subsection 17B-1-1303(1)(b), the administrative body shall hold
a public hearing on the proposed dissolution.
(2)  Each public hearing under Subsection (1) shall be held:
(a)  no later than 45 days after certification of the petition under Section
17B-1-1305 or adoption of a resolution under Subsection 17B-1-1303(1)(b), as
the case may be;
(b)  within the local district proposed to be dissolved;
(c)  on a weekday evening other than a holiday beginning no earlier than 6
p.m.; and
(d)  for the purpose of allowing:
(i)  the public to ask questions and obtain further information about the
proposed dissolution and issues raised by it; and
(ii)  any interested person to address the administrative body concerning the
proposed dissolution.
(3)  A quorum of the administrative body shall be present throughout each
public hearing under this section.
